Utah statutes.
53-8-207.   Falsely representing to be official station or safety inspector.
(1)  A person may not in any manner represent any place as a safety inspection
station unless the station is operating under a valid permit issued by the
division.
(2)  A person may not issue a safety inspection certificate unless the person:
(a)  is a safety inspector certified by the division;
(b)  is operating under a valid safety inspection station permit issued by the
division; and
(c)  performs the safety inspection on the motor vehicle in compliance with
Section 53-8-205.
(3)  An unauthorized person may not knowingly possess safety inspection
certificates.
